Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPORTS ON A TRANSITIONAL BENEFIT DEMONSTRATION PROJECT.new text end new text begin (a) By January 15, 2026, the commissioner of human services and the commissioner of children, youth, and families shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance and children, youth, and families policy and finance on the feasibility of a demonstration project that continues to offer program benefits to individuals no longer eligible for certain programs during a transition period to reduce benefit cliffs and incentivize those individuals to take advantage of career advancement opportunities. In the report, the commissioners shall evaluate the health care, income assistance, and social service programs administered by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Children, Youth, and Families, and designate programs for which it is feasible to continue benefits for individuals who lose program eligibility due to increased employment income. new text end new text begin (b) In determining whether the demonstration project is feasible, the commissioners shall evaluate and, as applicable, provide recommendations on: new text end new text begin (1) the programs that would be part of the demonstration project; new text end new text begin (2) the income and time limits beyond which former enrollees of a program would no longer receive transition benefits, including whether a standard income limit would apply across all programs; new text end new text begin (3) the number and characteristics of counties that would participate in the demonstration project; new text end new text begin (4) the changes to program benefits, premiums, and cost-sharing for former and current program enrollees necessary to ensure that the demonstration project is budget neutral; new text end new text begin (5) any federal waivers, law changes, and approvals necessary to include each program in the demonstration project; and new text end new text begin (6) evaluation criteria and an evaluation process for the demonstration project. new text end new text begin (c) In identifying programs for possible inclusion in the demonstration project, the commissioners must, at a minimum, evaluate the following programs: medical assistance, MinnesotaCare, the Minnesota family investment program, the diversionary work program, general assistance, housing support, the child care assistance program, and programs financed through behavioral health fund payments. new text end